Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 12. Miscellaneous.

§ 13.1-1067.
Property title records.

Whenever the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission reflect that a domestic or foreign limited liability company, or any protected series thereof, has changed or corrected its name, merged into a domestic or foreign limited liability company, corporation, business trust, limited partnership or partnership, converted to or from a domestic or foreign corporation, business trust, limited partnership or partnership, or domesticated in or from another jurisdiction, the clerk of the Commission, upon request, shall issue a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication. The certificate may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any court’s office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the limited liability company is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

Whenever a foreign limited liability company or foreign protected series has changed or corrected its name, merged into another business entity, converted into another type of business entity, or domesticated in another jurisdiction, and it cannot or chooses not to obtain a certificate reciting such change, correction, merger, conversion or domestication from the clerk of the Commission pursuant to subsection A, a similar certificate by any competent authority of the foreign limited liability company’s or foreign protected series’ jurisdiction of formation may be admitted to record in the deed books, in accordance with §

17.1-227

, of any recording office within the jurisdiction of which any property of the limited liability company is located in order to maintain the continuity of title records. The person filing the certificate shall pay a fee of $10 to the clerk of the court, but no tax shall be due thereon.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1992, cc. 574, 575; 1993, c. 113; 1996, c. 282; 1997, c. 190; 2001, c. 548; 2003, c. 340; 2006, c. 912; 2007, c. 771; 2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 636, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted “or any protected series thereof” and substituted “to or from a domestic or foreign corporation” for “into a domestic or foreign corporation”; and in subsection B, inserted “or foreign protected series” and substituted “or foreign protected series’ jurisdiction of formation” for “jurisdiction of organization.”

§ 13.1-1067.1.
Repealed by Acts 1993, c. 113.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-1067.1

, relating to transfer of title to real property when partnership is converted to a limited liability company, was enacted by Acts 1992, c. 574.

§ 13.1-1068.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-1068

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1991, c. 168.

§ 13.1-1069.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 839, effective October 1, 2005.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-1069

, relating to when “person” includes limited liability company, was enacted by Acts 1991, c. 168.